Illinois, session 104th, HB3284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 11-306.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-306.1 new)7    Sec. 11-306.1. Specialized traffic control devices. A 8municipality or unit of local government may erect and 9maintain a specialized traffic control device at an 10intersection where an emergency response vehicle enters the 11roadway or within 1,000 feet from a structure where such 12vehicles are stored. The specialized traffic control device 13may be controlled by the emergency response unit or fire 14station as the emergency response vehicle enters or exits 15traffic.